Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.490

Indemnification of state employees.

(1) The state shall indemnify and hold harmless its employees in the amount of any judgment obtained or fine levied against an employee in any state or federal court, or in the amount of the settlement of a claim, or shall pay the judgment, fine, or settlement, if the act or omission that gave rise to the civil or criminal liability was in good faith and occurred while the employee was acting within the scope of his or her employment or duties and the employee is being represented in accordance with RCW 4.92.070.

(2) For purposes of this section "state employee" means a member of the civil service or an exempt person under chapter 41.06 RCW, or *higher education personnel under chapter 28B.16 RCW.

[ 1989 c 413 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 28B.16 RCW was repealed by 1993 c 281, with the exception of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.16.240, which was recodified as RCW 41.06.382. The powers, duties, and functions of the state higher education personnel board were transferred to the Washington personnel resources board. RCW 28B.16.015 and 41.06.382 were subsequently repealed by 2002 c 354 s 403, effective July 1, 2005.